Missouri, session 2026, HB2331.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.628, to read as follows:
167.628. 1. As used in this section, "sunscreen" means a compound topically
applied to prevent sunburn.
2. A public school, which includes a charter school, shall permit a student,
without a parent or physician's authorization, to possess and self-apply sunscreen that is
regulated by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.
3. If a student is unable to self-apply sunscreen, a school employee may apply the
sunscreen on the student if the student's parent or guardian provides written consent
for such assistance.
4. A school employee who applies sunscreen on a student in compliance with
subsection 3 of this section, as well as the employee's employer, shall not be liable for:
(1) An adverse reaction suffered by the student as a result of having the
sunscreen applied; or
(2) Discontinuing the application of the sunscreen at any time.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.